Translation/utils/liblouis-3.31.0/tables/ko-g2-rules.cti
always 따염 6-24-126-156-26
always 따엽 6-24-126-156-12
always 따엾 6-24-126-156-12-3
always 따엿 6-24-126-156-3
always 따였 6-24-126-156-34
always 따영 6-24-126-12456
always 따옂 6-24-126-156-13
always 따옃 6-24-126-156-23
always 따옄 6-24-126-156-235
always 따옅 6-24-126-156-236
always 따옆 6-24-126-156-256
always 따옇 6-24-126-156-356
always 따예 6-24-126-34
always 따옉 6-24-126-34-1
always 따옊 6-24-126-34-1-1
always 따옋 6-24-126-34-1-3
always 따옌 6-24-126-34-25
always 따옍 6-24-126-34-25-13
always 따옎 6-24-126-34-25-356
always 따옏 6-24-126-34-35
always 따옐 6-24-126-34-2
always 따옑 6-24-126-34-2-1
always 따옒 6-24-126-34-2-26
always 따옓 6-24-126-34-2-12
always 따옔 6-24-126-34-2-3
always 따옕 6-24-126-34-2-236
always 따옖 6-24-126-34-2-256
always 따옗 6-24-126-34-2-356
always 따옘 6-24-126-34-26
always 따옙 6-24-126-34-12
always 따옚 6-24-126-34-12-3
always 따옛 6-24-126-34-3
always 따옜 6-24-126-34-34
always 따옝 6-24-126-34-2356
always 따옞 6-24-126-34-13
always 따옟 6-24-126-34-23
always 따옠 6-24-126-34-235
always 따옡 6-24-126-34-236
always 따옢 6-24-126-34-256
always 따옣 6-24-126-34-356
always 따오 6-24-126-136
always 따옥 6-24-126-1346
always 따옦 6-24-126-1346-1
always 따옧 6-24-126-1346-3
always 따온 6-24-126-12356
always 따옩 6-24-126-12356-13
always 따옪 6-24-126-12356-356
always 따옫 6-24-126-136-35
always 따올 6-24-126-136-2
always 따옭 6-24-126-136-2-1
always 따옮 6-24-126-136-2-26
always 따옯 6-24-126-136-2-12
always 따옰 6-24-126-136-2-3
always 따옱 6-24-126-136-2-236
always 따옲 6-24-126-136-2-256
always 따옳 6-24-126-136-2-356
always 따옴 6-24-126-136-26
always 따옵 6-24-126-136-12
always 따옶 6-24-126-136-12-3
always 따옷 6-24-126-136-3
always 따옸 6-24-126-136-34
always 따옹 6-24-126-123456
always 따옺 6-24-126-136-13
always 따옻 6-24-126-136-23
always 따옼 6-24-126-136-235
always 따옽 6-24-126-136-236
always 따옾 6-24-126-136-256
always 따옿 6-24-126-136-356
always 따와 6-24-126-1236
always 따왁 6-24-126-1236-1
always 따왂 6-24-126-1236-1-1
always 따왃 6-24-126-1236-1-3
always 따완 6-24-126-1236-25
always 따왅 6-24-126-1236-25-13
always 따왆 6-24-126-1236-25-356
always 따왇 6-24-126-1236-35
always 따왈 6-24-126-1236-2
always 따왉 6-24-126-1236-2-1
always 따왊 6-24-126-1236-2-26
always 따왋 6-24-126-1236-2-12
always 따왌 6-24-126-1236-2-3
always 따왍 6-24-126-1236-2-236
always 따왎 6-24-126-1236-2-256
always 따왏 6-24-126-1236-2-356
always 따왐 6-24-126-1236-26
always 따왑 6-24-126-1236-12
always 따왒 6-24-126-1236-12-3
always 따왓 6-24-126-1236-3
always 따왔 6-24-126-1236-34
always 따왕 6-24-126-1236-2356
always 따왖 6-24-126-1236-13
always 따왗 6-24-126-1236-23
always 따왘 6-24-126-1236-235
always 따왙 6-24-126-1236-236
always 따왚 6-24-126-1236-256
always 따왛 6-24-126-1236-356
always 따왜 6-24-126-1236-1235
always 따왝 6-24-126-1236-1235-1
always 따왞 6-24-126-1236-1235-1-1
always 따왟 6-24-126-1236-1235-1-3
always 따왠 6-24-126-1236-1235-25
always 따왡 6-24-126-1236-1235-25-13
always 따왢 6-24-126-1236-1235-25-356
always 따왣 6-24-126-1236-1235-35
always 따왤 6-24-126-1236-1235-2
always 따왥 6-24-126-1236-1235-2-1
always 따왦 6-24-126-1236-1235-2-26
always 따왧 6-24-126-1236-1235-2-12
always 따왨 6-24-126-1236-1235-2-3
always 따왩 6-24-126-1236-1235-2-236
always 따왪 6-24-126-1236-1235-2-256
always 따왫 6-24-126-1236-1235-2-356
always 따왬 6-24-126-1236-1235-26
always 따왭 6-24-126-1236-1235-12
always 따왮 6-24-126-1236-1235-12-3
always 따왯 6-24-126-1236-1235-3
always 따왰 6-24-126-1236-1235-34
always 따왱 6-24-126-1236-1235-2356
always 따왲 6-24-126-1236-1235-13
always 따왳 6-24-126-1236-1235-23
always 따왴 6-24-126-1236-1235-235
always 따왵 6-24-126-1236-1235-236
always 따왶 6-24-126-1236-1235-256
always 따왷 6-24-126-1236-1235-356
always 따외 6-24-126-13456
always 따왹 6-24-126-13456-1
always 따왺 6-24-126-13456-1-1
always 따왻 6-24-126-13456-1-3
always 따왼 6-24-126-13456-25
always 따왽 6-24-126-13456-25-13
always 따왾 6-24-126-13456-25-356
always 따왿 6-24-126-13456-35
always 따욀 6-24-126-13456-2
always 따욁 6-24-126-13456-2-1
always 따욂 6-24-126-13456-2-26
always 따욃 6-24-126-13456-2-12
always 따욄 6-24-126-13456-2-3
always 따욅 6-24-126-13456-2-236
always 따욆 6-24-126-13456-2-256
always 따욇 6-24-126-13456-2-356
always 따욈 6-24-126-13456-26
always 따욉 6-24-126-13456-12
always 따욊 6-24-126-13456-12-3
always 따욋 6-24-126-13456-3
always 따욌 6-24-126-13456-34
always 따욍 6-24-126-13456-2356
always 따욎 6-24-126-13456-13
always 따욏 6-24-126-13456-23
always 따욐 6-24-126-13456-235
always 따욑 6-24-126-13456-236
always 따욒 6-24-126-13456-256
always 따욓 6-24-126-13456-356
always 따요 6-24-126-346
always 따욕 6-24-126-346-1
always 따욖 6-24-126-346-1-1
always 따욗 6-24-126-346-1-3
always 따욘 6-24-126-346-25
always 따욙 6-24-126-346-25-13
always 따욚 6-24-126-346-25-356
always 따욛 6-24-126-346-35
always 따욜 6-24-126-346-2
always 따욝 6-24-126-346-2-1
always 따욞 6-24-126-346-2-26
always 따욟 6-24-126-346-2-12
always 따욠 6-24-126-346-2-3
always 따욡 6-24-126-346-2-236
always 따욢 6-24-126-346-2-256
always 따욣 6-24-126-346-2-356
always 따욤 6-24-126-346-26
always 따욥 6-24-126-346-12
always 따욦 6-24-126-346-12-3
always 따욧 6-24-126-346-3
always 따욨 6-24-126-346-34
always 따용 6-24-126-346-2356
always 따욪 6-24-126-346-13
always 따욫 6-24-126-346-23
always 따욬 6-24-126-346-235
always 따욭 6-24-126-346-236
always 따욮 6-24-126-346-256
always 따욯 6-24-126-346-356
always 따우 6-24-126-134
always 따욱 6-24-126-134-1
always 따욲 6-24-126-134-1-1
always 따욳 6-24-126-134-1-3
always 따운 6-24-126-1245
always 따욵 6-24-126-1245-13
always 따욶 6-24-126-1245-356
always 따욷 6-24-126-134-35
always 따울 6-24-126-12346
always 따욹 6-24-126-12346-1
always 따욺 6-24-126-12346-26
always 따욻 6-24-126-12346-12
always 따욼 6-24-126-12346-3
always 따욽 6-24-126-12346-236
always 따욾 6-24-126-12346-256
always 따욿 6-24-126-12346-356
always 따움 6-24-126-134-26
always 따웁 6-24-126-134-12
always 따웂 6-24-126-134-12-3
always 따웃 6-24-126-134-3
always 따웄 6-24-126-134-34
always 따웅 6-24-126-134-2356
always 따웆 6-24-126-134-13
always 따웇 6-24-126-134-23
always 따웈 6-24-126-134-235
always 따웉 6-24-126-134-236
always 따웊 6-24-126-134-256
always 따웋 6-24-126-134-356
always 따워 6-24-126-1234
always 따웍 6-24-126-1234-1
always 따웎 6-24-126-1234-1-1
always 따웏 6-24-126-1234-1-3
always 따원 6-24-126-1234-25
always 따웑 6-24-126-1234-25-13
always 따웒 6-24-126-1234-25-356
always 따웓 6-24-126-1234-35
always 따월 6-24-126-1234-2
always 따웕 6-24-126-1234-2-1
always 따웖 6-24-126-1234-2-26
always 따웗 6-24-126-1234-2-12
always 따웘 6-24-126-1234-2-3
always 따웙 6-24-126-1234-2-236
always 따웚 6-24-126-1234-2-256
always 따웛 6-24-126-1234-2-356
always 따웜 6-24-126-1234-26
always 따웝 6-24-126-1234-12
always 따웞 6-24-126-1234-12-3
always 따웟 6-24-126-1234-3
always 따웠 6-24-126-1234-34
always 따웡 6-24-126-1234-2356
always 따웢 6-24-126-1234-13
always 따웣 6-24-126-1234-23
always 따웤 6-24-126-1234-235
always 따웥 6-24-126-1234-236
always 따웦 6-24-126-1234-256
always 따웧 6-24-126-1234-356
always 따웨 6-24-126-1234-1235
always 따웩 6-24-126-1234-1235-1
always 따웪 6-24-126-1234-1235-1-1
always 따웫 6-24-126-1234-1235-1-3
always 따웬 6-24-126-1234-1235-25
always 따웭 6-24-126-1234-1235-25-13
always 따웮 6-24-126-1234-1235-25-356
always 따웯 6-24-126-1234-1235-35
always 따웰 6-24-126-1234-1235-2
always 따웱 6-24-126-1234-1235-2-1
always 따웲 6-24-126-1234-1235-2-26
always 따웳 6-24-126-1234-1235-2-12
always 따웴 6-24-126-1234-1235-2-3
always 따웵 6-24-126-1234-1235-2-236
always 따웶 6-24-126-1234-1235-2-256
always 따웷 6-24-126-1234-1235-2-356
always 따웸 6-24-126-1234-1235-26
always 따웹 6-24-126-1234-1235-12
always 따웺 6-24-126-1234-1235-12-3
always 따웻 6-24-126-1234-1235-3
always 따웼 6-24-126-1234-1235-34
always 따웽 6-24-126-1234-1235-2356
always 따웾 6-24-126-1234-1235-13
always 따웿 6-24-126-1234-1235-23
always 따윀 6-24-126-1234-1235-235
always 따윁 6-24-126-1234-1235-236
always 따윂 6-24-126-1234-1235-256
always 따윃 6-24-126-1234-1235-356
always 따위 6-24-126-134-1235
always 따윅 6-24-126-134-1235-1
always 따윆 6-24-126-134-1235-1-1
always 따윇 6-24-126-134-1235-1-3
always 따윈 6-24-126-134-1235-25
always 따윉 6-24-126-134-1235-25-13
always 따윊 6-24-126-134-1235-25-356
always 따윋 6-24-126-134-1235-35
always 따윌 6-24-126-134-1235-2
always 따윍 6-24-126-134-1235-2-1
always 따윎 6-24-126-134-1235-2-26
always 따윏 6-24-126-134-1235-2-12
always 따윐 6-24-126-134-1235-2-3
always 따윑 6-24-126-134-1235-2-236
always 따윒 6-24-126-134-1235-2-256
always 따윓 6-24-126-134-1235-2-356
always 따윔 6-24-126-134-1235-26
always 따윕 6-24-126-134-1235-12
always 따윖 6-24-126-134-1235-12-3
always 따윗 6-24-126-134-1235-3
always 따윘 6-24-126-134-1235-34
always 따윙 6-24-126-134-1235-2356
always 따윚 6-24-126-134-1235-13
always 따윛 6-24-126-134-1235-23
always 따윜 6-24-126-134-1235-235
always 따윝 6-24-126-134-1235-236
always 따윞 6-24-126-134-1235-256
always 따윟 6-24-126-134-1235-356
always 따유 6-24-126-146
always 따육 6-24-126-146-1
always 따윢 6-24-126-146-1-1
always 따윣 6-24-126-146-1-3
always 따윤 6-24-126-146-25
always 따윥 6-24-126-146-25-13
always 따윦 6-24-126-146-25-356
always 따윧 6-24-126-146-35
always 따율 6-24-126-146-2
always 따윩 6-24-126-146-2-1
always 따윪 6-24-126-146-2-26
always 따윫 6-24-126-146-2-12
always 따윬 6-24-126-146-2-3
always 따윭 6-24-126-146-2-236
always 따윮 6-24-126-146-2-256
always 따윯 6-24-126-146-2-356
always 따윰 6-24-126-146-26
always 따윱 6-24-126-146-12
always 따윲 6-24-126-146-12-3
always 따윳 6-24-126-146-3
always 따윴 6-24-126-146-34
always 따융 6-24-126-146-2356
always 따윶 6-24-126-146-13
always 따윷 6-24-126-146-23
always 따윸 6-24-126-146-235
always 따윹 6-24-126-146-236
always 따윺 6-24-126-146-256
always 따윻 6-24-126-146-356
always 따으 6-24-126-246
always 따윽 6-24-126-246-1
always 따윾 6-24-126-246-1-1
always 따윿 6-24-126-246-1-3
always 따은 6-24-126-1356
always 따읁 6-24-126-1356-13
always 따읂 6-24-126-1356-356
always 따읃 6-24-126-246-35
always 따을 6-24-126-2346
always 따읅 6-24-126-2346-1
always 따읆 6-24-126-2346-26
always 따읇 6-24-126-2346-12
always 따읈 6-24-126-2346-3
always 따읉 6-24-126-2346-236
always 따읊 6-24-126-2346-256
always 따읋 6-24-126-2346-356
always 따음 6-24-126-246-26
always 따읍 6-24-126-246-12
always 따읎 6-24-126-246-12-3
always 따읏 6-24-126-246-3
always 따읐 6-24-126-246-34
always 따응 6-24-126-246-2356
always 따읒 6-24-126-246-13
always 따읓 6-24-126-246-23
always 따읔 6-24-126-246-235
always 따읕 6-24-126-246-236
always 따읖 6-24-126-246-256
always 따읗 6-24-126-246-356
always 따의 6-24-126-2456
always 따읙 6-24-126-2456-1
always 따읚 6-24-126-2456-1-1
always 따읛 6-24-126-2456-1-3
always 따읜 6-24-126-2456-25
always 따읝 6-24-126-2456-25-13
always 따읞 6-24-126-2456-25-356
always 따읟 6-24-126-2456-35
always 따읠 6-24-126-2456-2
always 따읡 6-24-126-2456-2-1
always 따읢 6-24-126-2456-2-26
always 따읣 6-24-126-2456-2-12
always 따읤 6-24-126-2456-2-3
always 따읥 6-24-126-2456-2-236
always 따읦 6-24-126-2456-2-256
always 따읧 6-24-126-2456-2-356
always 따읨 6-24-126-2456-26
always 따읩 6-24-126-2456-12
always 따읪 6-24-126-2456-12-3
always 따읫 6-24-126-2456-3
always 따읬 6-24-126-2456-34
always 따읭 6-24-126-2456-2356
always 따읮 6-24-126-2456-13
always 따읯 6-24-126-2456-23
always 따읰 6-24-126-2456-235
always 따읱 6-24-126-2456-236
always 따읲 6-24-126-2456-256
always 따읳 6-24-126-2456-356
always 따이 6-24-126-135
always 따익 6-24-126-135-1
always 따읶 6-24-126-135-1-1
always 따읷 6-24-126-135-1-3
always 따인 6-24-126-12345
always 따읹 6-24-126-12345-13
always 따읺 6-24-126-12345-356
always 따읻 6-24-126-135-35
always 따일 6-24-126-135-2
always 따읽 6-24-126-135-2-1
always 따읾 6-24-126-135-2-26
always 따읿 6-24-126-135-2-12
always 따잀 6-24-126-135-2-3
always 따잁 6-24-126-135-2-236
always 따잂 6-24-126-135-2-256
always 따잃 6-24-126-135-2-356
always 따임 6-24-126-135-26
always 따입 6-24-126-135-12
always 따잆 6-24-126-135-12-3
always 따잇 6-24-126-135-3
always 따있 6-24-126-135-34
always 따잉 6-24-126-135-2356
always 따잊 6-24-126-135-13
always 따잋 6-24-126-135-23
always 따잌 6-24-126-135-235
always 따잍 6-24-126-135-236
always 따잎 6-24-126-135-256
always 따잏 6-24-126-135-356
always 마아 15-126-126
always 마악 15-126-126-1
always 마앆 15-126-126-1-1
always 마앇 15-126-126-1-3
always 마안 15-126-126-25
always 마앉 15-126-126-25-13
always 마않 15-126-126-25-356
always 마앋 15-126-126-35
always 마알 15-126-126-2
always 마앍 15-126-126-2-1
always 마앎 15-126-126-2-26
always 마앏 15-126-126-2-12
always 마앐 15-126-126-2-3
always 마앑 15-126-126-2-236
always 마앒 15-126-126-2-256
always 마앓 15-126-126-2-356
always 마암 15-126-126-26
always 마압 15-126-126-12
always 마앖 15-126-126-12-3
always 마앗 15-126-126-3
always 마았 15-126-126-34
always 마앙 15-126-126-2356
